zh-TW: 橫幅懸掛五金類型: 黏性背膠; 夾扣; 角落綁帶; 附圓木棒; 金屬扣眼; 旗桿套 / 旗桿袋; 僅加固摺邊 (無五金配件); 頂部繩索; 魔鬼氈背膠; 其他
ru: Тип крепежа для баннера: Клейкая основа; Крепежные зажимы; Угловые завязки; Штанга в комплекте; Люверсы; Карман для флагштока; Только усиленный подгиб (без крепежа); Верхний шнур; Основа на липучке; Другое
sv: Hängningsutrustningstyp för banderoll: Självhäftande baksida; Fästflikar; Hörnband; Rundstav ingår; Öljetter; Kanal för stång; Endast förstärkt fåll (ingen utrustning); Rep i överkant; Kardborrebaksida; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de equipamento para pendurar banners: Verso adesivo; Abas com clipe; Amarras nos cantos; Vareta de fixação incluída; Ilhoses; Bainha para mastro; Apenas bainha reforçada (sem ferragens); Corda superior; Verso em velcro; Outros
tr: Afiş asma donanımı tipi: Yapışkanlı arka yüzey; Klips tırnakları; Köşe bağları; Dübel çubuğu dahil; Grometler; Direk kılıfı / direk cebi; Yalnızca güçlendirilmiş kenar (donanım yok); İpli üst; Cırt cırtlı arka yüzey; Diğer
pl: Typ elementów do zawieszenia banera: Podkład samoprzylepny; Uchwyty z klipsem; Wiązania narożne; Drążek w zestawie; Oczka; Tunel na maszt/drążek; Tylko wzmocniony brzeg (bez osprzętu); Górna linka; Podkład z rzepem; Inne
sl-SI: Tip opreme za obešanje transparentov: Samolepilna podlaga; Sponke; Kotni trakovi; Vključena palica; Kovinska ušesca; Žep za palico; Samo ojačan rob (brez pritrdilnih elementov); Vrv na vrhu; Sprijemalna podlaga; Drugo
en: Banner hanging hardware type: Adhesive backing; Clip tabs; Corner ties; Dowel rod included; Grommets; Pole sleeve / pole pocket; Reinforced hem only (no hardware); Rope top; Velcro backing; Other
it: Tipo di hardware per appendere striscioni: Retro adesivo; Alette a clip; Lacci angolari; Asta in legno inclusa; Occhielli; Tasca per asta / Passante per asta; Solo orlo rinforzato (nessuna minuteria); Fune superiore; Retro in velcro; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de hardware folosit pentru agățarea bannerului: Suport adeziv; Clipsuri de prindere; Șnururi de colț; Tijă de fixare inclusă; Ocheți; Manșon pentru tijă / buzunar pentru tijă; Doar tiv întărit (fără elemente de fixare); Frânghie superioară; Suport Velcro; Altele
cs: Typ závěsných prvků banneru: Samolepicí zadní strana; Zacvakávací úchytky; Rohové šňůrky; Včetně napínací tyče; Průchodky; Tunýlek na tyč; Pouze zesílený lem (bez kování); Lano v horní části; Suchý zip na zadní straně; Jiné
da: Type beslag til ophængning af banner: Selvklæbende bagside; Clips; Hjørnebånd; Rundstok medfølger; Kovser; Løbegang; Kun forstærket kant (intet hardware); Reb i toppen; Velcrobagside; Andet
nb: Type maskinvare for banneroppheng: Selvklebende bakside; Klipsfester; Hjørnesnorer; Trepinne inkludert; Maljer; Stanglomme / stangkanal; Forsterket fald (uten opphengsutstyr); Tau i toppen; Borrelåsbakside; Annet
el: Τύπος υλικού εξοπλισμού ανάρτησης banner: Αυτοκόλλητη πλάτη; Καρτέλες με κλιπ; Κορδόνια γωνιών; Περιλαμβάνεται ράβδος; Μεταλλικοί κρίκοι; Υποδοχή ιστού / κονταριού; Μόνο ενισχυμένο στρίφωμα (χωρίς εξαρτήματα στερέωσης); Σχοινί στο επάνω μέρος; Πλάτη Velcro; Άλλο
fi: Banderollin ripustimen tyyppi: Liimatausta; Klipsikiinnikkeet; Kulmanauhat; Ripustustanko sisältyy; Purjerenkaat; Tankokuja; Vain vahvistettu käänne (ei kiinnikkeitä); Yläköysi; Tarranauhatausta; Muu
vi: Loại trang thiết bị treo biểu ngữ: Mặt sau có keo dán; Tab kẹp; Dây buộc góc; Bao gồm thanh chốt; Khuy ore; Khe xỏ cọc / lỗ xỏ cọc; Chỉ gia cố mép (không có phụ kiện cứng); Dây luồn mép trên; Mặt sau dán Velcro; Khác
hu: Banner akasztóelemének típusa: Öntapadós hátlap; Csíptetős fülek; Sarokkötözők; Tartórúddal; Fémkarikák; Bújtató; Csak megerősített szegély (szerelvény nélkül); Köteles felső rész; Tépőzáras hátlap; Egyéb
ko: 배너 걸이용 하드웨어 유형: 접착식 뒷면; 클립 탭; 모서리 끈; 다월 봉 포함; 아일릿; 폴 슬리브 / 폴 포켓; 보강된 밑단만(하드웨어 없음); 로프 상단; 벨크로 뒷면; 기타
lt-LT: Reklamjuostės pakabinimo techninės įrangos tipas: Lipni nugarėlė; Tvirtinimo spaustukai; Kampiniai raiščiai; Pridedamas tvirtinimo strypas; Žiedeliai; Mova / kišenė stiebui; Tik sutvirtintas kraštas (be tvirtinimo detalių); Virvutė viršuje; Lipukų nugarėlė; Kita
bg-BG: Тип елемент за окачване на банери: Залепващ гръб; Щипки; Ъглови връзки; Включена пръчка; Капси; Джоб за пръчка; Само подсилен подгъв (без крепежни елементи); Горна част с въже; Гръб с велкро; Друго
nl: Banner ophangmateriaal type: Zelfklevende achterkant; Klemmetjes; Hoekkoorden; Inclusief ophangstok; Zeilringen; Tunnelsleuf / tunnelzoom; Alleen versterkte zoom (geen bevestigingsmateriaal); Touw bovenaan; Klittenbandrug; Overig
sk-SK: Typ hardvéru na zavesenie transparentu: Lepiaca zadná strana; Pripínacie pútka; Rohové šnúrky; Vrátane drevenej tyčky; Očká; Rukáv/tunel na tyč; Len zosilnený okraj (bez hardvéru); Vrchné lano; Zadná strana so suchým zipsom; Iné
zh-CN: 横幅悬挂五金件类型: 背胶; 夹子卡扣; 角带; 随附木榫/圆木棍; 金属索环; 穿杆套筒 / 穿杆袋; 仅加固折边（无五金件）; 顶部挂绳; 尼龙搭扣背衬; 其他
de: Typ der Banneraufhängung: Selbstklebende Rückseite; Clip-Laschen; Eck-Befestigungsbänder; Aufhängestab enthalten; Ösen; Stangensaum / Hohlsaum; Nur verstärkter Saum (ohne Zubehör); Seilaufhängung; Klettverschluss-Rückseite; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de equipamento para pendurar banner: Suporte adesivo; Abas com clipe; Atilhos de canto; Cavilha incluída; Ilhós; Bainha/bolso para varão; Apenas bainha reforçada (sem ferragens); Topo em corda; Suporte em velcro; Outro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์แขวนแบนเนอร์: แผ่นรองกาว; คลิปหนีบ; เชือกผูกมุม; มีหมุดไม้มาให้; ตาไก่; ปลอก/ช่องเสียบเสา; เย็บขอบเสริมความแข็งแรงเท่านั้น (ไม่มีอุปกรณ์ยึด); ร้อยเชือกด้านบน; แผ่นรองตีนตุ๊กแก; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo hardware para colgar pancartas: Reverso adhesivo; Pestañas de clip; Amarres en las esquinas; Varilla incluida; Ojales; Funda para poste / bolsillo para poste; Solo dobladillo reforzado (sin hardware); Cuerda superior; Reverso de velcro; Otro
ja: バナー吊り下げハードウェアタイプ: 粘着裏当て; クリップタブ; コーナータイ; 丸棒付属; ハトメ; ポールスリーブ/ポールポケット; 補強ヘムのみ (金具なし); ロープトップ; ベルクロ裏当て; その他
fr: Type de matériel de suspension de la bannière: Support adhésif; Languettes de fixation; Attaches de coin; Baguette incluse; Œillets; Fourreau pour mât; Ourlet renforcé uniquement (sans matériel); Corde supérieure; Dos autoagrippant; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta dijelova za vješanje zastavica: Ljepljiva poleđina; Kopče; Kutne vezice; Uključena šipka; Ušice; Navlaka za šipku; Samo ojačani rub (bez okova); Uže na vrhu; Čičak na poleđini; Ostalo